Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1607
Discontinuance of service; third-party notice procedure.

Each utility subject to section 70-1603 or 70-1605 shall establish a third-party notice procedure for the notification of a designated third party of any proposed discontinuance of service and shall advise its subscribers, including new subscribers, of the availability of such procedures.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2705;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 7.